aspell/se_affix.dat
SFX J   0                   neaset                  ui   
SFX J   0                   neaskka                 ui   
SFX J   0                   neatte                  ui   
SFX J   0                   neattet                 ui   
SFX J   0                   nis                     ui   

# MALIS
SFX K Y 70
# +Sg+Nom -is -us
SFX K	0				in						[aiu][nsš]
# +Sg+Acc -is/-ás -us/-os
SFX K	0				a						[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				an						[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				asade					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				asadet					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				asame					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				asamet					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				asan						[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				asas						[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				asaset					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				asaska					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				asat						[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				at						[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				eame						[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				eamet					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				easet					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				easkka					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				eatte					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				eattet					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				ii						[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iid						[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iidda					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddis					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddiset					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddisetguin				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddisguin				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddiska					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddiskaguin				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddáde					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddádeguin				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddádet					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddádetguin				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddáme					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddámeguin				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddámet					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddámetguin				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddán					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddánguin				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddásan					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddásat					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddáseame				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddáseamet				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddáseaset				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddáseaskka				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddáseatte				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddáseattet				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddásis					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddát					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiddátguin				[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iiguin					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iin						[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iinnis					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iinniset					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iinniska					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iinnáde					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iinnádet					[oaá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iinnáme					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iinnámet					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iinnán					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				iinnát					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				is						[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				isttis					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				isttiset					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				isttiska					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				isttáde					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				isttádet					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				isttáme					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				isttámet					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				isttán					[aoá][nsš]
SFX K	0				isttát					[aoá][nsš]

# VERBS
SFX N Y 155
# basic
SFX N	at				á						at
SFX N	it				á						it
SFX N	t				0						ut
SFX N	t				beahtti					[aeiouá]t
SFX N	t				ba						[aeiouá]t
SFX N	t				behtet					[aeiouá]t
SFX N	t				n						[aeioá]t
SFX N	t				0						[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jetne					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jedne					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jedje					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jit						[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jin						[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jehkon					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jehkos					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jus						át
SFX N	t				jeadnu					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jeahkku					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jeahkki					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jehkoska				[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jetnot					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jehkot					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jeahkkot				[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jeadnot					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jehket					[áeo]t
SFX N	t				jehkoset				[áeo]t
SFX N	at				u						at
SFX N	at				et						at
SFX N	at				i						at
SFX N	at				ot						at
SFX N	ut				ot						ut
SFX N   t               dettiin                 [eo]t
SFX N   t               dettiinan                 [eo]t
SFX N   t               dettiinat                 [eo]t
SFX N   t               dettiineame                 [eo]t
SFX N   t               dettiineamet                 [eo]t
SFX N   t               dettiineaset                 [eo]t
SFX N   t               dettiineaskka                 [eo]t
SFX N   t               dettiineatte                 [eo]t
SFX N   t               dettiineattet                 [eo]t
SFX N   t               dettiinis                 [eo]t
SFX N   t               diin                    [eo]t
SFX N   t               din                     [eo]t
SFX N   t               haga                    [eo]t
SFX N   t               je                      [eo]t
SFX N   t               jeaddji                 [eo]t
SFX N   t               jeahkket                [eo]t
SFX N   t               keahttá                 [eo]t
#SFX N   0               n                       a
#SFX N   0               t                       a
#SFX N   a               eaba                       a
#SFX N   a               eaddji                       a
#SFX N   a               eadnot                       a
#SFX N   a               eadnu                       a
#SFX N   a               eahkket                       a
#SFX N   a               eahkki                       a
#SFX N   a               eahkkot                       a
#SFX N   a               eahkku                       a
#SFX N   a               eahppi                       a
#SFX N   a               eačča                       a
#SFX N   a               eaččan                       a
#SFX N   a               eaččat                       a
#SFX N   a               eaš                       a
#SFX N   a               eažžaba                       a
#SFX N   a               eažžabeahtti                       a
#SFX N   a               eažžabehtet                       a
#SFX N   a               eažžat                       a
#SFX N   a               eažžá                       a
#SFX N   a               edne                       a
#SFX N   a               ehket                       a
#SFX N   a               ehkon                       a
#SFX N   a               ehkos                       a
#SFX N   a               ehkoset                       a
#SFX N   a               ehkoska                       a
#SFX N   a               ehkot                       a
#SFX N   a               ehpet                       a
#SFX N   a               etne                       a
#SFX N   a               etnot                       a
#SFX N   a               ettiin                       a
#SFX N   a               eš                       a
#SFX N   a               ežže                       a
#SFX N   a               ežžet                       a
#SFX N   a               in                       a
#SFX N   a               ivččen                       a
#SFX N   a               ivččet                       a
#SFX N   a               ivččii                       a
SFX N   ha              t                       ha
SFX N   ha              thaga                       ha
SFX N   ha              tkeahttá                       ha
SFX N   it              án                      it
SFX N   t               min                     t
SFX N   t               me                     t
SFX N   t               mis                     t
SFX N   t               men                     t
SFX N   t               ma                      t
SFX N   t               nveara                     t
SFX N   t               nvearan                     t


# cg
SFX N   n               dettiin                 [au]n
SFX N   n               diin                    [au]n
SFX N   n               din                     [au]n
SFX N   n               haga                    [au]n
SFX N   n               keahttá                 [au]n
SFX N   un               odettiin                 un
SFX N   un               odiin                    un
SFX N   un               odin                     un
SFX N   un               ohaga                    un
SFX N   un               okeahttá                 un
SFX N	n				t						[auá]n
SFX N	n				i						[auá]n
SFX N	n				ime						[auá]n
SFX N	n				ide						[auá]n
SFX N	n				iga						[auá]n
SFX N	n				imet						[auá]n
SFX N	n				idet						[auá]n
SFX N	n				0						[auáeo]n
SFX N   n               le                      an
SFX N   n               ledje                 an
SFX N   n               leidde                 an
SFX N   n               leiddet                 an
SFX N   n               leigga                 an
SFX N   n               leimme                 an
SFX N   n               leimmet                 an
SFX N   n               lii                 an
SFX N   n               lin                 an
SFX N   n               lit                 an
SFX N	0				n						ža
SFX N	0				t						ža
SFX N	a				e						ža
SFX N	a				etne						ža
SFX N	a				edne						ža
SFX N	a				eahppi					ža
SFX N	a				eaba						ža
SFX N	a				it						ža
SFX N	a				ehpet					ža
SFX N	ža				š						ža
#SFX N	in				0						in
SFX N	n				t						in
SFX N	n				i						in
SFX N	in				eimme					in
SFX N	in				eidde					in
SFX N	in				eigga					in
SFX N	in				eimmet					in
SFX N	in				eiddet					in
SFX N	in				edje						in
SFX N	in				e						in
SFX N   án              e                       án
SFX N   án              edettiin                án
SFX N   án              edettiinan              án
SFX N   án              edettiinat              án
SFX N   án              edettiineame              án
SFX N   án              edettiineamet              án
SFX N   án              edettiineaset              án
SFX N   án              edettiineaskka              án
SFX N   án              edettiineatte              án
SFX N   án              edettiineattet              án
SFX N   án              edettiinis              án
SFX N   án              ediin                 án
SFX N   án              edin                     án
SFX N   án              ehaga                 án
SFX N   án              ekeahtes              án
SFX N   án              ekeahttá              án
SFX N   án              i                       án
SFX N   án              idettiin                án
SFX N   án              idettiinan              án
SFX N   án              idettiinat              án
SFX N   án              idettiineame              án
SFX N   án              idettiineamet              án
SFX N   án              idettiineaset              án
SFX N   án              idettiineaskka              án
SFX N   án              idettiineatte              án
SFX N   án              idettiineattet              án
SFX N   án              idettiinis              án
SFX N   án              idiin                 án
SFX N   án              idin                     án
SFX N   án              ihaga                 án
SFX N   án              ikeahtes              án
SFX N   án              ikeahttá              án

# ds
SFX N	0				t						[eo]
SFX N	0				n						[eo]
SFX N	0				n						o
SFX N	0				t						o
SFX N	0				s						o
SFX N	0				set						o
SFX N	0				ska						o
SFX N	e				on						e
SFX N	e				ot						e
SFX N	e				os						e
SFX N	e				oset						e
SFX N	e				oska						e
# ds & cg
SFX N	0				me						[iu]i
SFX N	0				de						[iu]i
SFX N	0				ga						[iu]i
SFX N	0				met						[iu]i
SFX N	0				det						[iu]i
